Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1984.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
The Legislature finds and declares the following:
A. Domestic abuse, stalking, dating violence, sexual assault,
human trafficking, and related abuse are life-threatening issues
Req. No. 11167 Page 1

that have lasting and harmful effects on individuals, families, and
communities.
B. Abuse survivors often lack resources, options, and
meaningful support when establishing independence from an abuser,
including the barriers of financial insecurity and limited access to
reliable means to maintain essential connections with family, social
safety networks, employers, and support services. Abuse survivors
may share a car title with an abusive partner, and safe access to an
automobile can be a lifeline for an abuse survivor.
C. Abusive partners increasingly use technological and
communication tools to exercise control over, monitor, and abuse
their victims. Cases of technology-enabled stalking and abuse
involving vehicles are increasing as automakers include app-
connected remote access and digital features. Through these apps,
abusive partners are tracking, surveilling, and intimidating abuse
survivors through location-tracking and remote-control functions to
turn on the ignition, adjust the vehicle's climate, lock doors, turn
off electric charging, honk the horn, record video footage and
audio, and use other means of electronically or remotely controlling
the vehicle. Tracking can be viewed in real time, or location
history records can be accessed and reviewed at a later time.
D. Tracking often occurs unbeknownst to an abuse victim, who
may be unaware that the vehicle is app-connected or that an abusive
partner has remote access through such technologies as mobile phone
Req. No. 11167 Page 2

wire less connectivity and location data capabilities that are
manufactured into vehicles.
E. Safeguards within vehicle design and remote access can
prevent future abuse, including requiring app-connected and tracking
notifications to be designed to provide knowledge of who has
vehicular access.
F. According to privacy researchers and as reported in the New
York Times, modern vehicles have been called smartphones with wheels
because they are Internet-connected and have myriad methods of data
collection, from cameras and seat weight sensors to records of how
hard you brake and corner. Most drivers do not realize how much
information their cars are collecting and who has access to it.
G. Under the federal Safe Connections Act of 2022, survivors of
domestic abuse are empowered to protect themselves and their loved
ones by requiring telecommunications providers, upon request, to
separate their mobile phone accounts from the accounts of their
abusers, but the law does not extend to vehicular technology.
H. It is the intent of this act to end stalking and abuse by
abusive partners who can access connected vehicle service.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1901 of Title 47, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Unless the context requires otherwise, for purposes of this act:

Req. No. 11167 Page 3

1. "Account holder" means a person who is a party to or a user
of services provided under a contract for connected vehicle service
with a covered provider, and includes, but is not limited to, a
subscriber, customer, or registered user;
2. "Connected vehicle location access" is a type of connected
vehicle service that allows a person who is outside of a vehicle,
excluding a covered provider or vehicle cellular data provider, to
view or track the location of the vehicle, including, but not
limited to, a location determined by a Global Positioning System
(GPS), whether through the Internet, an app-based technology, or any
other remote wireless connectivity technology;
3. "Connected vehicle service" means any capability provided by
or on behalf of a vehicle manufacturer that enables a person,
excluding a covered provider or vehicle cellular data provider, to
remotely obtain data from, or send commands to, a vehicle, which may
be accomplished through a software application that is designed to
be operated on a mobile device;
4. "Connected vehicle service account" means an account or
other means by which a person enrolls in or obtains access to a
connected vehicle service;
5. "Connected vehicle service request" means a request by a
driver to terminate a person's access to connected vehicle service;
and

Req. No. 11167 Page 4

6. "Covered provider" means a vehicle manufacturer or an entity
acting on behalf of the vehicle manufacturer that provides connected
vehicle service.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1902 of Title 47, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A vehicle with connected vehicle service shall clearly indicate
to a person who is inside the vehicle when a person who is outside
the vehicle has accessed either of the following:
1. Connected vehicle service; or
2. Connected vehicle location access.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1903 of Title 47, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of
this act or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall
not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect
without the invalid provision or application.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1904 of Title 47, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act does not apply to vehicles owned or operated by a
rental company.

Req. No. 11167 Page 5

SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1905 of Title 47, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A covered provider or any officer, director, employee, vendor,
or agent of a covered provider shall not be subject to liability for
any claims deriving from an action taken in compliance with this
act.
SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1906 of Title 47, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A covered provider shall provide a process that includes a
prominent and clearly visible link entitled "HOW TO DISCONNECT
REMOTE VEHICLE ACCESS" on its Internet website to complete both of
the following transactions:
1. Submit a connected vehicle service request; and
2. Obtain a new connected vehicle service account.
B. A covered provider shall ensure that all communications
provided pursuant to this act are clear, concise, and written in
accessible language. It is imperative that drivers, particularly
those who are abuse survivors, receive support and clear guidance
throughout the process for submitting a connected vehicle service
request or obtaining a new connected vehicle service account.


Req. No. 11167 Page 6

SECTION 8. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1907 of Title 47, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
To enhance transparency and communication, the process to submit
a connected vehicle service request or obtain a new connected
vehicle service account shall be efficient, secure, user-friendly,
and include all of the following features:
1. Upon submission of a connected vehicle service request or
request to obtain a new connected vehicle service account, the
covered provider shall automatically send a confirmation email to
the driver, acknowledging the receipt of the request. This email
shall contain a reference number for the request and an outline of
the subsequent steps in the process;
2. Upon completing the review of the request, the covered
provider shall inform the driver of the action taken, including, as
applicable, whether a person's access to connected vehicle service
has been terminated, or if additional information or proof of legal
possession of the vehicle is needed. This alert shall clearly state
any relevant details or further actions required from the driver to
complete a successful connected vehicle service request; and
3. If a connected vehicle service request is approved, the
covered provider shall provide the driver with a clear explanation
and guidance on how to create their own connected vehicle service
account, if applicable, to ensure that the driver can maintain
Req. No. 11167 Page 7

cont rol over the connected vehicle service once another person's
access to connected vehicle service has been terminated.
SECTION 9. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1908 of Title 47, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A driver shall demonstrate to a covered provider the
authority to terminate a person's access to connected vehicle
service by providing both of the following:
1. The vehicle identification number; and
2. Proof of legal possession of the vehicle, which may be a
legal title to the vehicle, or a dissolution decree, temporary court
order, or domestic violence restraining order that awards possession
or exclusive use of the vehicle to the driver. A court order
awarding sole possession or exclusive use of a vehicle shall take
priority over a vehicle title showing joint ownership for purposes
of this act.
B. A covered provider shall not require a driver to provide any
proof of legal possession other than what is required in subsection
A of this section to establish the authority to terminate a person's
access to connected vehicle service.
C. A covered provider shall not require a driver to take any
action to terminate a person's access to connected vehicle service
other than what is set forth in this section, including, but not
limited to, requiring any of the following:
Req. No. 11167 Page 8

1. Payment of a fee, penalty, or other charge to complete a
connected vehicle service request;
2. Maintaining or extending the term of a connected vehicle
service account;
3. Approval by any account holder, including, but not limited
to, the named account holder, of the change in access; or
4. An increase in the rate charged for the connected vehicle
service.
D. A covered provider shall terminate a person's access to
connected vehicle service within two (2) business days after the
date of receiving a completed request from a driver who meets the
requirements of this section.
SECTION 10. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1909 of Title 47, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. If a covered provider terminated a person's access to
connected vehicle service in response to a connected vehicle service
request, the covered provider shall not provide to the person any
data or information regarding the driver, the vehicle, or any new
connected vehicle service account that was generated after that
person's access to the connected vehicle service was terminated.
B. A covered provider shall ensure that all personal
information provided during the process to terminate a person's
access to connected vehicle service is handled with appropriate
Req. No. 11167 Page 9

secu rity and privacy, adhering to relevant data protection laws and
regulations.
C. A covered provider and any officer, director, employee,
vendor, or agent thereof shall treat any information submitted by a
driver pursuant to this act as confidential and shall comply with
applicable privacy laws.
D. A covered provider shall not share information submitted by
a driver pursuant to this act with any third party without the
affirmative consent of the driver, unless sharing that information
is required to effectuate a connected vehicle service request.
E. Nothing in this section shall preclude a covered provider
from responding to a court order or warrant.
SECTION 11. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1910 of Title 47, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The termination of connected vehicle service pursuant to this
act shall not be deemed to impact legal ownership of a vehicle.
SECTION 12. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1911 of Title 47, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
If a vehicle includes connected vehicle location access, a
covered provider shall provide a mechanism that can be used by a
driver who is inside a vehicle to immediately disable connected
vehicle location access.
Req. No. 11167 Page 10

SECTION 13. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1912 of Title 47, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A mechanism for disabling connected vehicle location access
shall meet all of the following requirements:
1. Be prominently located and easy to use;
2. Not require access to, or use of, a remote or online
application;
3. Not require account creation, a password, or login
information.
A vehicle manufacturer may require a driver to input a mobile
number associated with the connected vehicle service account. If a
vehicle manufacturer requires a driver to input a mobile number in
order to disable the connected vehicle location access connection,
it shall not require any further information in order to allow the
driver to disable the connection, including, but not limited to,
using that number as part of a two-factor authentication process
that results in sending a code to the mobile number; and
4. Allow connected vehicle location access that has been
disabled from inside the vehicle to be enabled only by a driver who
is located inside the vehicle.
SECTION 14. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1913 of Title 47, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Req. No. 11167 Page 11

Disabling the connected vehicle location access from inside the
vehicle shall not result in an account holder of the connected
vehicle service, vehicle manufacturer, or a third-party service
provider receiving any notification related to the connected vehicle
location access being disabled, including, but not limited to, an
alert, email, text, or telephone call.
SECTION 15. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1914 of Title 47, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The provisions of this act shall apply:
1. On the effective date of this act for vehicles that have
connected vehicle service on the effective date of this act;
2. On July 1, 2026, for vehicles manufactured prior to January
1, 2028, that have connected vehicle location access and have the
capability to receive software updates that provide for the
functionality required by Sections 12 through 15 of this act; and
3. On January 1, 2028, for vehicles manufactured on or after
January 1, 2028, that have connected vehicle location access.
SECTION 16. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11167 CMA 01/03/25



Req. No. 11167 Page 12